Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8404
Access; charges.

Except as provided in sections 71-8405 and 71-8407, for medical records provided under section 71-8403 or under subpoena by a patient or his or her authorized representative a provider may charge no more than twenty dollars as a handling fee and may charge no more than fifty cents per page as a copying fee. A provider may charge for the reasonable cost of all duplications of medical records which cannot routinely be copied or duplicated on a standard photocopy machine. A provider may charge an amount necessary to cover the cost of labor and materials for furnishing a copy of an X-ray or similar special medical record. If the provider does not have the ability to reproduce X-rays or other records requested, the person making the request may arrange, at his or her expense, for the reproduction of such records.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 4.